Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-142
Cancellation or registration of mark; action; procedure.

(1) Actions to require cancellation of a mark registered pursuant to the Trademark Registration Act or in mandamus to compel registration of a mark pursuant to the act shall be brought in the district court of Lancaster County. In an action in mandamus, the proceeding shall be based solely upon the record before the secretary. In an action for cancellation, the secretary shall not be made a party to the proceeding but shall be notified of the filing of the complaint by the clerk of the court in which it is filed and shall be given the right to intervene in the action.

(2) In any action brought against a nonresident registrant, service may be effected upon the secretary as agent for service of the registrant in accordance with the procedures established for service upon nonresident corporations and business entities under section 25-509.01.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 17.